Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.280

State treasurer receiving agent of certain federal aid—Withdrawals.

The board of regents of Washington State University may authorize the treasurer or comptroller of Washington State University to withdraw such federal grants for the use of the university for the purposes of such grant and in accordance with state law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.280. Prior: 1955 c 66 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.80.223.]